en: Chinese shrimp dumplings, Cooked steamed shrimp dumplings, Cooked steamed shrimp dumpling
fr: Raviolis chinois à la crevette, Ravioli à la crevette

en: Shaomai
ja: 焼売, しゅうまい

en: Wonton
ja: ワンタン, 餛飩

en: Gyoza, Japanese ravioli
xx: Gyoza
fr: Gyoza, Gyosa, Ravioli japonais
ja: 餃子, ギョウザ
nl: Gyoza, Japanse ravioli

en: Vegetable gyoza
fr: Gyoza aux légumes, Gyosa aux légumes
nl: Gyozas met kip

en: Chicken gyoza
fr: Gyoza au poulet

en: Pork gyoza
fr: Gyoza au porc

en: Beef gyoza
fr: Gyoza au bœuf

en: Shrimp gyoza
fr: Gyoza aux crevettes, Gyozas aux crevettes, Gyosas aux crevettes, Gyoza à la crevette
nl: Gyozas met garnalen

en: Meat tortellinis
de: Fleischtortellini
fr: Tortellini à la viande
hr: Mesne torteline
it: Tortellini di carne
nl: Vleestortellini

en: Vegetables tortellinis
fr: Tortellini aux légumes
hr: Tortelini od povrća
nl: Groentetortellini

en: Frozen varenyky, frozen vareniki
fr: Varenyky surgelés

en: Acras, Accras
fr: Acras, Accras
hr: Acras
nl: Acra
zh: 法式咸鳕鱼炸丸子

en: Cod acras, Cod accras
fr: Acras de morue, Accras de morue, acras de cabillaud
hr: Bakalar acras
it: Frittelle di merluzzo, Frittelle di baccalà
nl: Kabeljauwacra

en: Truffades
fr: Truffades
hr: Trufadi
ja: トリュファード
nl: Truffade

en: Aligots, Aligot, Mashed potatoes with fresh tome cheese
fr: Aligots, Aligot, Purée de pomme de terre à la tomme fraîche
hr: Aligoti
it: Aligot
nl: Aligot
zh: 阿利戈土豆奶酪泥

en: Pâté, Paté, Pate
de: Pasteten
es: Paté
fr: Pâté
hr: paštete, pašteta
it: Paté
ja: パテ
pl: Pasztet, Pasztety
pt: Patés
ru: Паштет
sl: paštete, pašteta

en: Liver Pâtés, Liver Pates
fr: Pâtés de foie
hr: Jetrene paštete
ro: Pate de ficat

en: Kombuchas
xx: Kombucha
ar: كومبوتشا
be: Чайны квас
bg: Комбуча
ca: Kombutxa
el: Κομπούχα
eo: Kombuĉoj
es: Té kombucha
et: Teeseenejook
eu: Konbutxa
fa: کامبوچا
fi: Kombutsat, Kombuchat
fr: Kombuchas, combuchas
hi: कोम्बुचा
hy: Կոմբուչա
io: Kombucho
is: Sveppate
ja: 紅茶キノコ, コンブチャ
ka: Ჩაის სოკო
ko: 콤부차
lt: Kombuča
lv: Kombuča
mk: Комбуча
nl: Komboecha
pl: Kombucza
ru: Чайный квас
sk: Kombuča
sl: Kombuča
sr: Kombusa
tg: Замбурӯғчой
th: คมบูชะ
tr: Kombu Çayı
uk: Чайний квас
vi: Nấm thuỷ sâm
zh: 红茶菌, 紅茶菌

en: Kvass
xx: Kvas, Kvass, Kwas
ar: كفاس
be: Квас
bg: Квас
ca: Kvass
cu: Квасъ
cv: Кăвас
da: Kvass
de: Kwas
el: Κβας
eo: Kvasoj
et: Kali
fa: کواس
fi: Kvassi
fr: Kvass
hu: Kvasz
hy: Կվաս
io: Kvaso
ja: クワス
ka: Ბურახი
ko: 크바스
kv: Ырӧш
ky: Квас
lt: Gira
nb: Kvass
nn: Kvass
os: Къуымæл
pl: Kwas chlebowy
ru: Квас
sr: Квас
sv: Kvass
ta: குவாசு
ug: كاۋاس
zh: 格瓦斯, 克瓦斯